District of Columbia statutes.
31-3410

Repealed

Grievance procedures

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-235, § 11, 44 DCR 818
Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-274, § 501(a)(4), 46 DCR 1294
This section is referenced in § 31-3419.
1981 Ed., § 35-4510.
Application of Law 12-274: Section 501(b) of D.C. Law 12-274 provided that this section shall apply upon the promulgation of regulations pursuant to § 32-574.1 § 44-304.01, 2001 Ed. .